Hawaii statutes.
§78-31 Paid leave; education of children. Employees
shall be eligible for up to two hours of paid leave during normal business
hours to attend either:

(1) A mutually-scheduled parent-teacher conference
for the employee's child attending a public or private school in grades
kindergarten through twelve; or

(2) A mutually-scheduled parent-caregiver conference
for a preschool-aged child attending a licensed group child care center, as
defined under section 346-151;

provided that the time-off shall not be credited
against vacation or sick leave benefits, if any; and provided further that the
provision of paid leave shall not adversely interfere with the operations of
the work unit nor require the applicable agency to incur additional human
resources or overtime costs.

The employee shall take no more than two
mutually-scheduled conferences, per child, in a single calendar year. Travel
time shall be included as part of the two hours permitted for each conference.
[L 2003, c 108, §1; am L 2004, c 194, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next